Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 46.18.200 and 2022 c 239 s 2 and 2022 c 117 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Special license plate series reviewed and approved by the department:(a) May be issued in lieu of standard issue or personalized license plates for vehicles required to display one and two license plates unless otherwise specified;(b) Must be issued under terms and conditions established by the department;(c) Must not be issued for vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW; and(d) Must display a symbol or artwork approved by the department.(2) The department approves and shall issue the following special license plates, subject to subsection (5) of this section:LICENSE PLATEDESCRIPTION, SYMBOL, OR ARTWORK4-HDisplays the "4-H" logo.Armed forces collectionRecognizes the contribution of veterans, active duty military personnel, reservists, and members of the national guard, and includes six separate designs, each containing a symbol representing a different branch of the armed forces to include army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard, and national guard.Breast cancer awarenessDisplays a pink ribbon symbolizing breast cancer awareness.Endangered wildlifeDisplays a symbol or artwork symbolizing endangered wildlife in Washington state.Fred HutchDisplays the Fred Hutch logo.Gonzaga University alumni associationRecognizes the Gonzaga University alumni association.Helping kids speakRecognizes an organization that supports programs that provide no-cost speech pathology programs to children.Keep kids safeRecognizes efforts to prevent child abuse and neglect.Law enforcement memorialHonors law enforcement officers in Washington killed in the line of duty.Mount St. HelensDisplays an image of Mount St. Helens.Music mattersDisplays the "Music Matters" logo.Patches pal, or alternative name as designated by the department under RCW 46.04.383Displays the likenesses of the J.P. Patches and Gertrude characters from the J.P. Patches show, or characters otherwise identified in accordance with RCW 46.04.383.Professional firefighters and paramedicsRecognizes professional firefighters and paramedics who are members of the Washington state council of firefighters.San Juan IslandsDisplays a symbol or artwork recognizing the San Juan Islands.Seattle MarinersDisplays the "Seattle Mariners" logo.Seattle NHL hockeyDisplays the logo of the Seattle NHL hockey team.Seattle SeahawksDisplays the "Seattle Seahawks" logo.Seattle Sounders FCDisplays the "Seattle Sounders FC" logo.Seattle StormDisplays the "Seattle Storm" logo.Seattle UniversityRecognizes Seattle University.Share the roadRecognizes an organization that promotes bicycle safety and awareness education.Ski & ride WashingtonRecognizes the Washington snowsports industry.State flowerRecognizes the Washington state flower.Volunteer firefightersRecognizes volunteer firefighters.Washington applesDisplays the Washington apple logo that recognizes the state's apple industry, the growers and shippers who produce and pack the world famous apples, and the tree fruit community.Washington farmers and ranchersRecognizes farmers and ranchers in Washington state.Washington lighthousesRecognizes an organization that supports selected Washington state lighthouses and provides environmental education programs.Washington state aviationDisplays a Stearman biplane in the foreground with an image of Mount Rainier in the background.Washington state parksRecognizes Washington state parks as premier destinations of uncommon quality that preserve significant natural, cultural, historical, and recreational resources.Washington state wrestlingPromotes and supports college wrestling in the state of Washington.Washington tennisBuilds awareness and year-round opportunities for tennis in Washington state. Displays a symbol or artwork recognizing tennis in Washington state.Washington wineDisplays a landscape of Washington's wine regions.Washington's fish collectionRecognizes Washington's fish.Washington's national park fundBuilds awareness of Washington's national parks and supports priority park programs and projects in Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging communities, and providing educational opportunities related to Washington's national parks.Washington's wildlife collectionRecognizes Washington's wildlife.We love our petsRecognizes an organization that assists local member agencies of the federation of animal welfare and control agencies to promote and perform spay/neuter surgery on Washington state pets to reduce pet overpopulation.Wild on WashingtonSymbolizes wildlife viewing in Washington state.(3) Applicants for initial and renewal professional firefighters and paramedics special license plates must show proof of eligibility by providing a certificate of current membership from the Washington state council of firefighters.(4) Applicants for initial volunteer firefighters special license plates must (a) have been a volunteer firefighter for at least ((ten))10 years or be a volunteer firefighter for one or more years and (b) have documentation of service from the district of the appropriate fire service. If the volunteer firefighter leaves firefighting service before ((ten))10 years of service have been completed, the volunteer firefighter shall surrender the license plates to the department on the registration renewal date. If the volunteer firefighter stays in service for at least ((ten))10 years and then leaves, the license plate may be retained by the former volunteer firefighter and as long as the license plate is retained for use the person will continue to pay the future registration renewals. A qualifying volunteer firefighter may have no more than one set of license plates per vehicle, and a maximum of two sets per applicant, for their personal vehicles. If the volunteer firefighter is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or a felony, the license plates must be surrendered upon conviction.(5) The department shall not issue the Seattle NHL hockey special license plate until the department receives signature sheets satisfying the requirements identified in RCW 46.18.110(2)(f).Sec. 2. RCW 46.17.220 and 2022 c 239 s 1 and 2022 c 117 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application for a vehicle registration in chapter 46.16A RCW, the holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate special license plate fee as listed in this section.PLATE TYPEINITIAL FEERENEWAL FEEDISTRIBUTED UNDER(1) 4-H$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(2) Amateur radio license$ 5.00N/ARCW 46.68.070(3) Armed forces$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(4) Breast cancer awareness$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(5) Collector vehicle$ 35.00N/ARCW 46.68.030(6) Collegiate$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.430(7) Endangered wildlife$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(8) Fred Hutch$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(9) Gonzaga University alumni association$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(10) Helping kids speak$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(11) Horseless carriage$ 35.00N/ARCW 46.68.030(12) Keep kids safe$ 45.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(13) Law enforcement memorial$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(14) Military affiliate radio system$ 5.00N/ARCW 46.68.070(15) Mount St. Helens$40.00$30.00RCW 46.68.420(16) Music matters$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((16)))(17) Patches pal, or alternative name as designated by the department under RCW 46.04.383$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((17)))(18) Professional firefighters and paramedics$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((18)))(19) Purple Heart$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(((19)))(20) Ride share$ 25.00N/ARCW 46.68.030(((20)))(21) San Juan Islands$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((21)))(22) Seattle Mariners$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((22)))(23) Seattle NHL hockey$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((23)))(24) Seattle Seahawks$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((24)))(25) Seattle Sounders FC$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((25)))(26) Seattle Storm$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((26)))(27) Seattle University$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((27)))(28) Share the road$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((28)))(29) Ski & ride Washington$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((29)))(30) Square dancer$ 40.00N/ARCW 46.68.070(((30)))(31) State flower$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((31)))(32) Volunteer firefighters$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((32)))(33) Washington apples$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((33)))(34) Washington farmers and ranchers$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((34)))(35) Washington lighthouses$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((35)))(36) Washington state aviation$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((36)))(37) Washington state parks$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(((37)))(38) Washington state wrestling$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((38)))(39) Washington tennis$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((39)))(40) Washington wine$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((40)))(41) Washington's fish collection$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(((41)))(42) Washington's national parks$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((42)))(43) Washington's wildlife collection$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(((43)))(44) We love our pets$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((44)))(45) Wild on Washington$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425Sec. 3. RCW 46.68.420 and 2022 c 239 s 3, 2022 c 117 s 3, and 2022 c 96 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall:(a) Collect special license plate fees established under RCW 46.17.220;(b) Deduct an amount not to exceed ((twelve dollars))$12 for initial issue and two dollars for renewal issue for administration and collection expenses incurred by it; and(c) Remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.(2) The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle fund until the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the special license plate. Upon determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the state treasurer shall credit the remaining special license plate fee amounts for each special license plate to the following appropriate account as created in this section in the custody of the state treasurer:ACCOUNTCONDITIONS FOR USE OF FUNDS4-H programsSupport Washington 4-H programsFred HutchSupport cancer research at the Fred Hutchinson cancer research centerGonzaga University alumni associationScholarship funds to needy and qualified students attending or planning to attend Gonzaga UniversityHelping kids speakProvide free diagnostic and therapeutic services to families of children who suffer from a delay in language or speech developmentLaw enforcement memorialProvide support and assistance to survivors and families of law enforcement officers in Washington killed in the line of duty and to organize, finance, fund, construct, utilize, and maintain a memorial on the state capitol grounds to honor those fallen officersLighthouse environmental programsSupport selected Washington state lighthouses that are accessible to the public and staffed by volunteers; provide environmental education programs; provide grants for other Washington lighthouses to assist in funding infrastructure preservation and restoration; encourage and support interpretive programs by lighthouse docentsMount St. HelensPromote education, stewardship, and science at Mount St. Helens through the Mount St. Helens instituteMusic matters awarenessPromote music education in schools throughout WashingtonPatches pal, or alternative name as designated by the department under RCW 46.04.383Provide funds to the Seattle children's hospital strong against cancer programSan Juan Islands programsProvide funds to the Madrona instituteSeattle MarinersProvide funds to the sports mentoring program and to support the Washington world fellows program in the following manner: (a) ((Seventy-five))75 percent to the Washington state leadership board solely to administer the sports mentoring program established under RCW 43.388.040, to encourage youth who have economic needs or face adversities to experience spectator sports or get involved in youth sports, and (b) up to ((twenty-five))25 percent to the Washington state leadership board solely to administer the Washington world fellows program, an equity focused programSeattle NHL hockeyProvide funds to the NHL Seattle foundation and to support the boundless Washington program in the following manner: (a) ((Fifty))50 percent to the NHL Seattle foundation, or its successor organization, to help marginalized youth succeed in life through increased access to sports and other opportunities; (b) ((twenty-five))25 percent to the Washington state leadership board solely to administer the boundless Washington program to facilitate opportunities for young people with physical and sensory disabilities to enjoy and experience the outdoors; and (c) ((twenty-five))25 percent to the NHL Seattle foundation, or its successor organization, for providing financial support to allow youth to participate in hockeySeattle SeahawksProvide funds to InvestED and to support the Washington world fellows program in the following manner: (a) ((Seventy-five))75 percent, to InvestED, to encourage secondary students who have economic needs to stay in school, return to school, or get involved within their learning community; and (b) ((twenty-five))25 percent to the Washington state leadership board solely to administer the Washington world fellows program, including the provision of fellowshipsSeattle Sounders FCProvide funds to Washington state mentors and the Washington state leadership board in the following manner: (a) ((Seventy))70 percent and the remaining proceeds, if any, to Washington state mentors, to increase the number of mentors in the state by offering mentoring grants throughout Washington state that foster positive youth development and academic success, with up to ((twenty))20 percent of these proceeds authorized for program administration costs; and (b) up to ((thirty))30 percent, not to exceed ((forty-thousand dollars))$40,000 annually as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management, to the Washington state leadership board, to develop Washington state educational, veterans, international relations, and civics projects and to recognize the outstanding public service of individuals or groups in the state of WashingtonSeattle StormProvide funds to the Washington state legislative youth advisory council and the Washington state leadership board in the following manner: ((Twenty-five thousand dollars))$25,000 per year of the net proceeds to the legislative youth advisory council, or its successor organization; and the remaining net proceeds on an annual basis, to the Washington state leadership board for the purpose of providing grants to support and enhance athletic, recreational, and other opportunities for women and girls, and especially those with disabilitiesSeattle UniversityFund scholarships for students attending or planning to attend Seattle UniversityShare the roadPromote bicycle safety and awareness education in communities throughout WashingtonSki & ride WashingtonPromote winter snowsports, such as skiing and snowboarding, and related programs, such as ski and ride safety programs, underprivileged youth ski and ride programs, and active, healthy lifestyle programsState flowerSupport Meerkerk Rhododendron Gardens and provide for grants to other qualified nonprofit organizations' efforts to preserve rhododendronsVolunteer firefightersReceive and disseminate funds for purposes on behalf of volunteer firefighters, their families, and others deemed in needWashington applesProvide scholarship funding to the tree fruit industry's official charity, the Washington apple education foundation, which provides financial support, professional employment preparedness training, and mentorship to students with ties to the apple industry pursuing a higher educationWashington farmers and ranchersProvide funds to the Washington FFA Foundation for educational programs in Washington stateWashington state aviationProvide funds to the department of transportation to support infrastructure improvements at public use airports in Washington stateWashington state council of firefighters benevolent fundReceive and disseminate funds for charitable purposes on behalf of members of the Washington state council of firefighters, their families, and others deemed in needWashington state wrestlingProvide funds to the Washington state wrestling foundation to fund new and existing college wrestling programsWashington tennisProvide funds to cities to assist in the construction and maintenance of a public tennis facility with at least four indoor tennis courts. A city is eligible for construction funds if the city does not already have a public or private facility with at least four indoor tennis courts. Funds for construction must first be made available to the most populous eligible city, according to the most recent census, for a time period not to exceed five years after January 1, 2017. After the five-year time period, the funds for construction must be made available to the next most populous eligible city. Funds for the maintenance of a public tennis facility with at least four indoor tennis courts must first be made available to the first eligible city that utilizes funds for construction provided by chapter 16, Laws of 2016Washington wineProvide funds to the state of Washington tourism to promote tourism throughout Washington stateWashington's national park fundBuild awareness of Washington's national parks and support priority park programs and projects in Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging communities, and providing educational opportunities related to Washington's national parksWe love our petsSupport and enable the Washington federation of animal welfare and control agencies to promote and perform spay/neuter surgery of Washington state pets in order to reduce pet population(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the accounts described in subsection (2) of this section. The accounts are subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section, funds in the special license plate accounts described in subsection (2) of this section must be disbursed subject to the conditions described in subsection (2) of this section and under contract between the department and qualified nonprofit organizations that provide the services described in subsection (2) of this section.(5) Funds from the Seattle Seahawks account may be provided to the Washington state leadership board solely for the purpose of administering the Washington world fellows program. Of the amounts received by the Washington state leadership board under this subsection, at least ((ninety))90 percent must be provided as fellowships under the program.(6) Beginning January 1, 2019, funds from the Seattle Mariners account may be provided to the Washington state leadership board solely for the purpose of administering the sports mentoring program. Of the amounts received by the Washington state leadership board, at least ((ninety))90 percent must be applied towards services directly provided to youth participants.(7) For the purposes of this section, a "qualified nonprofit organization" means a not-for-profit corporation operating in Washington that has received a determination of tax exempt status under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3). The qualified nonprofit organization must meet all the requirements under RCW 46.18.100(1).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:"Mount St. Helens license plate" means special license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display an image of Mount St. Helens.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. This act takes effect November 1, 2025.--- END ---